District of Columbia statutes.
49-1005

Transfers; abolishment.

(a)

All positions, property, records, and allocations available or to be made available to the Department of Human Services for the veterans affairs functions set out in Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979, effective February 21, 1980, Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, effective January 3, 1987 (part B of subchapter VII of Chapter 15 of Title 1, D.C. Official Code), and Department of Human Services Organization Order No. 169, effective March 2, 1988, are hereby transferred to the Office of Veterans Affairs established by this chapter.

(b)

The Office of Veterans Affairs, established as an organizational component of the Department of Human Services by section IV(a)(2) of Reorganization Plan No. 2 of 1979 (part A of subchapter III of Chapter 15 of Title 1, D.C. Official Code), and Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1986, is abolished.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 706, 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 88, 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated a previously made technical correction.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 706 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).